Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Student Athlete Name, Image, and Likeness Rights Reform Act of
2026".
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-13898 AQH 01/05/26





Req. No. 13898 Page 1